Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8902
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act is to protect the public health, safety, and welfare by providing for the authorization and licensure of veterinary drug distributors in the State of Nebraska and for the development, establishment, and enforcement of basic standards for such distributors.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 2.